   #Viceroy Research » Feed Viceroy Research » Comments Feed Viceroy
   Research WordPress.com

   Skip to content

Viceroy Research

   At the peak of tulip mania, in March 1637, some single tulip bulbs sold
   for more than 10 times the annual income of a skilled craftsman.
   (BUTTON) Menu

     * Home
     * About
     * Contact

     * Twitter
     * Contact Us
     * Contact

   Viceroy Research

   Featured

Pareteum – The Hal Turner Options Appreciation Club

   July 17, 2019 – We ask investors today to consider what Viceroy
   believes is an excessive enrichment by Pareteum’s Executive Chairman
   and Principal Executive Officer’s share ownership and compensation:
     * Reflect a low level of confidence in the company given Hal’s
       immediate offering of 2,000,000 shares as part of the 2018
       Long-Term Incentive Plan
     * Show the acquisition of Artilium helped Turner vest and sell shares
       in Pareteum at an accelerated rate, despite no clear reason for
       this vesting, save for an convenient amendment in the terms.

   Report Download Link

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 17/07/2019Categories Pareteum
   NASDAQ:TEUMLeave a comment on Pareteum – The Hal Turner Options
   Appreciation Club

   Featured

Ebix – FOIA response confirms enforcement investigation

   July 1, 2019 – SEC withholds FOIA documentation as it could reasonably
   be expected to interfere with enforcement activities, and disclose
   identities of confidential sources and whistleblowers.

   Report Download Link

   On December 11, 2018, Viceroy released our preliminary report on Ebix
   Inc. (NASDAQ:EBIX), within which we reported on numerous historical and
   potential ongoing regulatory investigations into the Company and its
   conduct internationally. You can find our report here:

   https://viceroyresearch.org/category/ebix-nasdaqebix/

   On June 20, 2019, the SEC responded to a Freedom of Information Act
   document request, within which the SEC has withheld requests pursuant
   to 5 U.S.C. § 552 (b) (3), (6), (7)(A), (7)(C) and/or (7)(D).

   This document mirrors responses from the SEC’s Office of FOIA Services
   relating to MiMedx. Upon our dissemination of this report, the Company
   subsequently admitted to investigations by the SEC, DOJ and VA, amongst
   potentially numerous other acronyms.

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 01/07/2019Categories Ebix
   NASDAQ:EBIXLeave a comment on Ebix – FOIA response confirms
   enforcement investigation

   Featured

Pareteum – The Sound of Silence

   June 27, 2019 – Viceroy issues response to Pareteum’s statement on
   “Short Seller Attacks”

   Report Download Link

   Pareteum can continue to categorically deny “short seller attacks”.
   This will not bring substance to contracts, magically collect
   skyrocketing receivables, or explain related party transactions.

   Viceroy stands by our research.

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 28/06/2019Categories Pareteum
   NASDAQ:TEUMLeave a comment on Pareteum – The Sound of Silence

   Featured

Pareteum – Executive Overview

   June 27, 2019 – This report unveils troubling data Viceroy Research has
   encountered while conducting background checks on Pareteum’s management
   team.

   Report Download Link

   “David Hess and David John join Pareteum as we are rocketing towards
   our growth goals as a global technology” company…Hiring talent to
   expand our North America presence and connect into Latin America is the
   obvious step in acquiring new customers and new revenue that will
   ensure we exceed our targets”
   – Hal Turner, CEO

   David John, Vice-President Pareteum, was hired by Hal Turner with
   apparent pride in October 2018, and cited as Managing Director, CALA
   for Pareteum Corp.

   Viceroy have double checked multiple sources to confirm David John’s
   full name is, in fact, David John Fondots.

   There appears to be a very good reason why Mr Fondots has omitted his
   last name from his public-facing corporate profile

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 27/06/2019Categories Pareteum
   NASDAQ:TEUMLeave a comment on Pareteum – Executive Overview

   Featured

Pareteum – The Wild West of Telecoms

   June 25, 2019 – Pareteum (NASDAQ:TEUM) provides services to Mobile
   Virtual Network Operators (MVNOs), who sell data/minutes to users and
   purchase data/minutes from telecom network operators. Recently Pareteum
   has been subject to criticism from other short sellers. Given the
   discourse, Viceroy believe it is prudent that we also share our
   findings.

   Report Download Link
     * Further to recent research reports, Pareteum has a history of
       promotional press releases of customer wins. A deeper investigation
       into these customers show much larger number are insignificant, and
       the companies behind them appear in no way capable of fulfilling
       the contract values advertised by Pareteum.
     * Two of Pareteum’s customer wins appear to be undisclosed related
       parties tied to Pareteum consultant Dinesh “Danny” Patel.
     * One of Pareteum’s announced customer wins is a company under a
       historic investigation and charged with significant VAT evasion
       fraud. Information on this is easily available, leading us to
       believe that Pareteum was aware of the company’s issues while
       announcing the customer win.
     * Pareteum appears to be in breach of US sanctions against Iran
       through its provision of services to Iranian MVNO Amin SMC. Amin
       SMC appears to be chaired by Hamid Reza Amirinia, an individual
       suspected of breaching sanctions with an Iranian government mandate
       to launder money for the regime.
     * Several entities on the pareteum.cloud domain are small companies
       or have no web presence whatsoever, leading us to believe that they
       are Pareteum customers who are unable to pay or have no operations.
     * Pareteum’s 36-month contractual backlog measurement is not an
       accurate predictor of future profits. An analysis of the company’s
       backlog and management comments shows it should have reported
       73.10% more revenue in Q1 2019 than it did. Management appears to
       be inflating this figure to hype up the share price and reassure
       investors.
     * Pareteum’s management has a history of dishonest reporting.
       Notably, CFO Ted O’Donnell who was sued by former employer AudioEye
       for fabricating US$8.1m worth of revenue over 3 quarters which was
       found to have no supporting documentation. This was an
       overstatement of revenues in the period of more than 3,000%.
     * Pareteum’s rapid-fire announcement of customer wins mirrors its
       announcements regarding cryptocurrency in 2017, which were put to
       an abrupt halt when a response to an SEC letter revealed TEUM had
       made no revenue, nor planned to do so, from cryptocurrency.
     * Pareteum has made an US$3.7m loan to Yonder Media Mobile, an early
       stage MVNO operated by serial failure entrepreneur Adam Kidron.
       Kidron has burned at least US$100m in his enterprises, having
       already cratered the Yonder brand with a music streaming service
       which collapsed in 2017.
     * A breakdown of Pareteum’s revenues, cash flows and receivables show
       the majority of its revenue from sources other than Vodafone and
       acquired businesses iPass and Artilium appears to be uncollectable.
       Accordingly, we believe total revenue is overstated by 42%,
       corroborating our findings regarding Pareteum’s customers.

   We are as yet unable to quantify the impact of the company’s apparent
   breach of sanctions against Iran and have not assigned a discount. We
   have reported this apparent breach to the relevant federal authorities.

   A token valuation on an EV/Revenue basis presents a 44% – 76% downside
   for Pareteum’s share price (State Current Price), with the more severe
   scenario more probable. However, based on the numerous subjective
   issues highlighted in this report and the dependence of the valuation
   on our already-conservative revenue adjustment, we cannot fully
   quantify the downside, which we believe to be significant.

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 26/06/2019Categories Pareteum
   NASDAQ:TEUMLeave a comment on Pareteum – The Wild West of Telecoms

   Featured

Viceroy Members Commence Litigation Against MiMedx and Parker H Petit

   JUNE 17, 2019 – Please find Viceroy’s members’ complaint, filed on June
   17, 2019, below:

   Complaint – Download Link

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 17/06/201917/06/2019Categories MiMedx
   NASDAQ:MDXGLeave a comment on Viceroy Members Commence Litigation
   Against MiMedx and Parker H Petit

   Featured

Ebix’s Legal Letter to Viceroy

   May 7, 2019 – For completeness, please find Ebix’s legal letter to
   Viceroy, dated April 1, 2019, below:

   Ebix Legal Letter to Viceroy – April 1, 2019

   We are responding to Ebix’s claims in full on twitter:

   http://www.twitter.com/viceroyresearch


   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 06/05/2019Categories Ebix
   NASDAQ:EBIXLeave a comment on Ebix’s Legal Letter to Viceroy

   Featured

Pretium – Pretium’s Predictable Predicament

   JANUARY 10, 2019 – Pretium released the Brucejack Mine’s Q4 2018
   production update yesterday after-market, and market reaction shows it
   fell short of expectations. Pretium’s ore grade has predictably fallen
   since Q2 2018 by >22%, leading to a miss of Pretium’s H2 low-end gold
   production guidance of 200,000 ounces. At 11.5g/t, Pretium’s head grade
   is now 30% below feasibility study sampling.

   Report Download Link

   Per our previous reports, Viceroy believe Pretium’s grades will
   continue to fall as Pretium appear to be at the tail end of extracting
   high-grade deposits found along the Cleopatra Vein. As a reminder to
   our readers, we have appended this section of our thesis to this note.

   Pretium have attributed their production and grade shortfall on their
   grade control system, which they state will be refined. We believe this
   is an unnerving excuse, and have provided substantial evidence to
   support our thesis that Pretium is overmining or selectively mining its
   deposits.

   Production capacity increases of Pretium’s mill will not fix this
   problem.

   Viceroy was astonished at the >10% PVG stock decline on massive volume
   on January 8, 2019, prior to any announcement by Pretium. This is
   likely related to earlier bullish sentiment disseminated by The Globe
   and Mail, who reported Barrick was ‘eyeing’ Pretium.

   We find it highly unlikely that Barrick would consider Pretium as an
   acquisition given it’s performance and grades have fallen well below
   expectation, and would likely not meet internal IRR criteria.

   Pretium has failed to address in any depth the issues raised in our
   report including:
     * The involvement of SEC-sanctioned fraudster Sima Muroff in the bulk
       sample program’s milling operations
     * The narrowing of drill core spacings as part of the grade control
       program, the results of which show no continuity within the VOK
       deposit
     * Accelerated mine development
     * Resignation of key consultants
     * Blown-out costs

   We maintain that Pretium is fundamentally overvalued, and see limited
   value in its current form.

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 10/01/201909/04/2019Categories Pretium
   TSE/NYSE:PVGLeave a comment on Pretium – Pretium’s
   Predictable Predicament

   Featured

Ebix – Ebix’s 2019 ‘Not-So-Good Business Acumen’ nomination

   JANUARY 7, 2019 – Ebix has characteristically ramped its press-release
   flow since the publication of Viceroy’s initial report and continued
   its acquisition spree. This report concerns management’s disregard for
   corporate governance, lack of transparency and due diligence.

   Report Download Link

   Ebix Inc (NASDAQ: EBIX) have come out with multiple acquisitions and
   service “deals” since our multiple publications on the Company. On
   further investigation, we found that one of Ebix’s announced contracts
   had not yet been finalized. Ebix retracted its press release about a
   Dubai Forex Services contract: investors were misled on the status of
   the contract.

   This is a major red flag, and exaggerates what we believe is an already
   extremely high risk investment strategy at Ebix.

   Investors will note that Ebix have avoided commenting on the audit
   committee’s recommendation for Ebix to retain the services of Top 4
   Auditor for regulatory reasons. We can only assume the Top 4 preferred
   to give ad hoc accountancy advice rather than full audit
   responsibilities.

   This report will also dive into Ebix’s near-miss attempted acquisition
   of now-insolvent Patriot National, which the company was looking to
   acquire just before its spectacular collapse.

   Ebix have so far decided to have fireside chats with investors while
   referring to our work as an old short thesis. Ebix have refused to
   account for Robin Raina’s poison pill bonus, the treatment of goodwill
   and the accounting irregularities.

   Our research into Ebix is ongoing however we believe the information
   puts into context Ebix’s recent announcements. We will shortly publish
   further data pertaining to the Ebix group’s internal cash movements.

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 07/01/201909/04/2019Categories Ebix
   NASDAQ:EBIXLeave a comment on Ebix – Ebix’s 2019 ‘Not-So-Good Business
   Acumen’ nomination

   Featured

Ebix – Diving into the Robin Raina Foundation

   Publicly available financials suggest the Robin Raina Foundation shares
   similar financial discrepancy issues and poor disclosure practices as
   Ebix.

   Report Download Link

   One of the Ebix’s CEO’s biggest self-promotion points is his commitment
   to charity. Kudos.

   As part of our due-diligence process, Viceroy has conducted background
   checks into Ebix’s directors and their ventures. When diving into the
   Robin Raina foundation, we  found inconsistencies between Robin Raina’s
   self-promotion of the Robin Raina Foundation (RRF) and the financial
   accounts of the foundation and its affiliates, and licensing issues
   across the US and India.

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 20/12/201809/04/2019Categories Ebix
   NASDAQ:EBIXLeave a comment on Ebix – Diving into the Robin
   Raina Foundation

   Featured

Ebix – The Taxman Cometh

   DECEMBER 13, 2018 – Ebix’s Mumbai office was “searched” by Indian tax
   authorities in Q3 2018. In other news, CEO Robin Raina claims Ebix has
   never “been on the wrong side of any regulatory or tax authority”.

   The Taxman Cometh – Report Download Link

   Viceroy released its preliminary report on Ebix – titled Goodwill
   Hunting – on 11 December 2017, the contents of which we also discussed
   at the Kase Learning conference in New York on December 3, 2018.

   This report will address the totally inadequate response Ebix issued on
   December 12, 2018, which was substantially an attempt at authority bias
   by CEO Robin Raina. Accordingly, we will also shine a light on the
   statements Raina decided to include in this press release, which we
   believe to be extremely misleading.
     * Ebix acknowledged our report via a press release on December 12,
       2018, however CEO Raina would rather issue a hollow press release
       than address the issues Viceroy have raised in our preceding
       report.
     * Robin Raina claims Ebix has “never been on the wrong side of any
       regulatory or tax authority”. This is inconsistent with:
          + Ebix’s Mumbai office being subject to an undisclosed “search”
            by Indian Tax Authorities for suspicion of tax evasion in late
            August 2018;
          + Ebix currently subject to a tax audit by the Australian
            Taxation office since at least 2016;
          + Ebix historically settling an IRS dispute for >$20m;
          + Ebix being subjected to a prolonged SEC investigation;
          + Ebix being subject to a possible ongoing DOJ investigation;
     * Contrary to Raina’s claims, it appears his conduct was subject to
       regulatory scrutiny even prior to his rise to CEO. Ebix’s former
       auditor, Arthur Anderson, was charged by the SEC for improper
       conduct and fraud relating to the audit of Ebix’s revenue
       recognition practices at a time where Raina was VP of Sales and
       Marketing and COO.
     * Robin Raina claims Ebix has had “no differences with any statutory
       or consolidated auditors across the world in the last two decades”.
       This is objectively, and verifiably false, as we have already
       reported.
     * Ebix detracts attention to concerns raised through reinforcement of
       its commitment to stock buybacks, of which it has announced US$330m
       since 2015 and only fulfilled US$187.169m.
     * Viceroy is writing to the relevant debt providers shortly with
       these and other material concerns.

   Viceroy’s original report can be found here:

   https://viceroyresearch.org/2018/12/11/ebix-goodwill-hunting-2/

   Ebix’s press release on December 12, 2018 can be found here:

   https://www.ebix.com/press-release/ebix-ceo-decides-to-take-salary-in-e
   bix-stock-instead-of-cash-the-company-commencing-purchase-of-ebix-stock
   -under-100-million-usd-repurchase-commitment-over-the-next-6-to-12-mont
   hs-period

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 13/12/201809/04/2019Categories Ebix
   NASDAQ:EBIXLeave a comment on Ebix – The Taxman Cometh

   Featured

Ebix – Goodwill Hunting

   Accounting irregularities, undisclosed tax investigations, auditor
   shuffling, poison pill to protect short sellers: welcome to Ebix.

   DECEMBER 11, 2018 – Following on from our presentation of the same
   title, Viceroy are releasing our preliminary report on Ebix, Inc
   (NASDAQ:EBIX). Our investigation has uncovered accounting discrepancies
   dating as far back as 2008 to present day as well as several other red
   flags.

   Report Download Link

   Filings.zip – Download Link
     * Numerous accounting discrepancies in years 2013 to 2018 regarding
       the recognition of goodwill and acquisitions within the Ebix group.
       These discrepancies have largely gone unnoticed due to the delay in
       local filings being signed off and the multi-jurisdictional nature
       of these transactions.
     * Over the course of our investigation we uncovered evidence of what
       we believe is a scheme to incorrectly book revenue and earnings. We
       believe this is done through the shuffling of assets from one
       subsidiary to another while improperly booking internal revenues,
       and contingent consideration “cookie jar” accounting.
     * We are limited by the recency of the available subsidiary filings.
       We believe this behavior continues to take place. Ebix’s
       acquisition spree in India further muddies the waters.
     * Ebix announced a change in auditor to T.R. Chadha from Cherry
       Bekaert (of MiMedx fame) after reporting material weaknesses
       regarding purchase and income tax accounting, pursuant to
       appointing a big four accounting firm in Q1 2019.
     * T.R. Chadha has never audited a US-listed entity and was auditor of
       several Indian Ebix subsidiaries in which there appear to be
       several accounting discrepancies.
     * Cherry Bekaert was subject to a scathing PCAOB inspection just
       weeks before its replacement.
     * Ebix’s subsidiary structure is excessively convoluted and opaque.
       The subsidiary structure includes holding companies in geographies
       where obtaining financials is near impossible. Many subsidiaries
       are held under a UK entity, Ebix International Holdings, which has
       only ever filed locally as a dormant company and recently received
       a warning of compulsory dissolution for failing to file accounts.
     * Ebix’s joint venture with Vayam Technologies, Ebix Vayam, accounts
       for 25% of Ebix’s receivables and only customers are Vayam
       Technologies themselves. Vayam appears never to have settled its
       receivables and the entire JV is funded by Ebix at an 8% interest
       rate, payable in receivables. This appears to be a scheme through
       which cash is injected in to make paper gains of margin plus 8%.
     * Ebix CEO Robin Raina is entitled to a massive payout in the event
       of an acquisition at the expense of shareholders. This poison pill
       protects short-sellers from takeovers by attaching an unreasonable
       premium to the company. This arrangement and its predecessor are
       currently subject of ongoing shareholder litigation.
     * The company’s debt-fueled acquisition binge in India was originally
       intended to create and list an Indian payments entity. This appears
       to have turned into an unfocused roll-up, with more and more
       scattered businesses being added to the Ebix stable. Despite these
       additions, Ebix does not break out its revenues from these
       disparate income streams.
     * Ebix’s has been subject to an undisclosed tax audit by the
       Australian Taxation Office since 2016, we believe due to the
       transfer of Telstra eBusiness Exchange assets to Ebix Singapore,
       and non-arm’s length transactions.

   Due to the delay in availability of subsidiary accounts, and the
   rapidly expanding nature of the company’s operations we are unable to
   quantify a base downside. We believe it is highly likely given the
   progress of the shareholder litigation that regulatory authorities
   including the SEC open or reopen their investigations into the company.
   Accordingly, we believe that Ebix carries a high investment risk.

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 11/12/201809/04/2019Categories Ebix
   NASDAQ:EBIXLeave a comment on Ebix – Goodwill Hunting

   Featured

NEPI Rockcastle – Mucking Out the Stable

   On November 28^th, 2018 Viceroy Research released a report regarding
   NEPI Rockcastle (JSE: NRP) detailing what we believed to be
   over-inflated profits in the company’s Romanian operations. NEPI issued
   a response to our research and hosted a call for concerned investors.

   NEPI Response 2018.12.06 – Download Link

   NEPI Dutch Filings – Download Link

   Unusually NEPI provided some clarity in terms of their accounting
   treatments. We maintain our belief that NEPI is fundamentally
   overvalued with reservations regarding the sustainability of
   distributable income, the tax treatment in foreign jurisdictions and
   the status of the overall company. This we will update on.
     * NEPI Rockcastle have not sought to deliver any scope of
       investigation in response to a request by investors in August 2018,
       and claim it is the prerogative of investors to identify the exact
       issues they want investigated. It seems clear what issues 10 of
       South Africa’s largest financial firms sought clarity on: potential
       trading of associated companies, suspicious capital raising
       activity and property transactions.
     * Per our original report, we were of the opinion that transfer
       pricing is not an adequate explanation as to why statutory losses
       are incurred in Romania. This is due to transfer pricing
       legislation in Romania and the EU. On further investigation, these
       hard currency, unsecured, intra-group loans are disclosed in NEPI’s
       Dutch subsidiary at rate of 8%-12%, compared to the Romanian
       mortgage rate of 4.5-5% and safe harbor limit of 4%. This is a
       stark contrast to the CFO’s description, in which she did not
       provide the figures, but guided the rate was between 4% to 8%.
     * Having obtained the filings of Dutch subsidiary, NE Property
       Cooperatief UA, we find it untenable how a local CFO or Financial
       Controller locally can advocate a “fair” and arm’s length transfer
       pricing interest rate on unsecured loans of 8%, formerly 12%.
       Essentially, the equity holders at the local level are being
       punished for an excessive and non-arm’s length priced loan. We make
       this assumption based on local Euro borrowing costs within Romania
       with an LTV of circa 28% as disclosed by NEPI.
     * NEPI uses the entirety of its funds earmarked for deferred tax
       payments to inflate its distributable earnings figure. In effect,
       the company is likely improving their dividend figures at the
       expense of future disbursements.
     * New anti-abuse legislation will materially hamper NEPI’s transfer
       pricing model going forward in Romania, Netherlands, and across the
       EU. Given the extent of transfer pricing, this will impact NEPI’s
       distributable earnings.
     * Taking a step back, it is delayed outgoings, not earnings, that
       substantiate ~20% of distributable earnings. The Romania tax
       channeling is in fact one of many adjustments that allow this
       unsustainable dividend practice. Other items that deserve scrutiny
       include the dividend contribution of stocks, the antecedent
       dividend add back and the sale of financial investments.
     * At a property yield of 6.77%; after accounting for cash costs,
       interest costs, taxes, and the stock trading at a premium to NAV,
       we fail to see how NEPI can justify a 7.5% dividend unless holders
       choose to take their dividend as scrip, which is dilutive and makes
       future dividends even harder to justify. Accordingly, we maintain
       our view that the stock is fundamentally overvalued.
     * Of concern is that large money managers, including retirement money
       managers PIC, have continuously chosen to take dividends as scrip.
     * SENS trading data shows entities associated with the Resilient
       stable associate Roque Hafner traded large amounts of NEPI shares
       at least for the period between May 2016 and May 2018. Hafner was
       implicated in the media as being involved in the Resilient insider
       trading scandal and several Hafner entities used to trade Resilient
       shares also traded NEPI shares.

   We reiterate our belief that NEPI Rockcastle’s shares carry a high
   investment risk and are fundamentally overvalued, which will become
   increasingly unattractive over time given what we believe are
   unsustainable distribution practices.

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 06/12/201809/04/2019Categories NEPI
   Rockcastle JSE:NRPLeave a comment on NEPI Rockcastle – Mucking Out
   the Stable

   Featured

Ebix – Goodwill Hunting

   The Alchemy of Creating Profits

   Ebix Presentation – Download Link

   Viceroy’s presented Ebix at the Kase Learning Conference on December 3,
   2018. We will shortly release a full report into our findings.

   Summary red flags:
     * Change in business model (IT providers to insurance v. finance
       sector) without visible synergies or management experience.
     * Accounting discrepancies suggests EBIX is booking external revenues
       on transactions between its subsidiaries: this occurred in 2014,
       2015, 2016, 2017 across multiple geographies (UK, Singapore, India,
       Dubai, Mauritius).
     * The company has a growing unbilled receivables balance:
     * 50% from by EBIX’s India JV (Ebix Vayam Technologies) whose only
       customer is the JV partner (Vayam): it appears to have no other
       customers, and 446 days of receivables.
     * Rapid change of company auditors, most recently the replacement of
       Cherry Bekaert with T.R. Chadha, an Indian auditor with no history
       of auditing a major US-listed entity.
     * Unnecessarily intricate and opaque subsidiary structure, with very
       little insight provided to investors. Many assets are being held in
       opaque geographies and have been transferred with no disclosure or
       justification.
     * The CEO has financially engineered an >US$825m “poison pill” to
       prevent any takeover by mandating a large payout to himself in the
       case of such a takeover.


   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 03/12/2018Categories Ebix
   NASDAQ:EBIXLeave a comment on Ebix – Goodwill Hunting

   Featured

NEPI Rockcastle – Response to statement by NEPI Rockcastle

   November 28, 2018 – Viceroy published its report on NEPI Rockcastle on
   November 28, 2018. NEPI Rockcastle have subsequently issued a
   preliminary response to our report.

   Viceroy Response 28 Nov 2018 – Download Link

   We note that our data was sourced directly from NEPI’s filings,
   government records, and court records. Where we have conducted
   calculations, our analysis and workings have been show in full.
   Investors have the ability to determine the veracity of our analysis
   and conduct their own due diligence.

   We are not of the opinion that NEPI has consistently proven
   transparency towards shareholders, the latest example of which is the
   outright refusal to engage an independent party to investigate
   potential trading of associated companies, suspicious capital raising
   activity and property transactions, at the request of 10 of South
   Africa’s largest financial institutions (including Government fund
   managers).

   In stark contrast to any “reasons” NEPI provides for accounting
   discrepancies, investors should also note with extreme caution that the
   Company failed to provide details of outgoings, arrears, management
   matters, negotiations, rent reviews, to its valuers, Cushman &
   Wakefield. This was not an issue for all its other geographies.

   Further to this, analysis of NEPI’s Romanian portfolio accounts show
   the company has, on average, 80 days of accounts receivable. This is
   indicative of substantial rent arrears, and fails the company’s claim
   of a 99.9% collection rate. These issues are independent of where
   earnings have been recognized, if this should indeed be NEPI’s
   response, and would not account for discrepancies in taxes paid in
   foreign jurisdictions.

   We look forward to NEPI’s comprehensive response to our report.


   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 28/11/201809/04/2019Categories NEPI
   Rockcastle JSE:NRPLeave a comment on NEPI Rockcastle – Response to
   statement by NEPI Rockcastle

   Featured

NEPI Rockcastle – Horsing around in the Stable

   Irreconcilable international earnings, enriching management through
   M&A, hoodwinking investors through misleading analysis via rejection of
   independent investigation.

   Report – Download Link

   Letter to Auditor – Download Link

   Romanian Subsidiary Filings – Download Link

   NEPI Rockcastle (JSE:NRP) is a JSE-listed entity holding one of the
   largest real-estate investment portfolios in Eastern Europe. Viceroy’s
   investigations have uncovered numerous inconsistencies within NEPI
   Rockcastle’s financial reporting and major links to an established
   financial fraud:
     * Local filings for NEPI’s Romanian subsidiaries suggest company
       figures are massively overstated for at least the past 3 years.
       Romania is NEPI’s largest geographical income segment in which
       consolidated 2017 group accounts show net profit before tax of EUR
       284.87m (2016: EUR 221.90m). Local income statements show these
       companies operate at losses of over >EUR 40m (2016: >EUR 50m) for
       the same period.
     * Viceroy believe corporate or tax-effective structure or transfer
       pricing does not adequately explain the substantial differences in
       Romanian earnings generation as NEPI’s reported income tax expenses
       in Romania also do not match local filings. Given the criminal
       implications of misrepresenting tax numbers to the Romanian tax
       office, we assume NEPI chose to instead mislead its shareholders.
     * NEPI’s recent acquisition of Rockcastle was immediately followed by
       a massive write-down of subsidiary loans reflecting uncollectable
       debt from SPVs. When taken together with the purchase premium for
       the business of almost 80%, it is clear that the only winners in
       the Rockcastle acquisition were Resilient Stable insiders.
     * NEPI’s former chairman Corneliu-Dan Pascariu was involved in
       Romanian real-estate venture CEEIF, funded by the Peregrine
       Financial fraud perpetrated by Russell Wasendorf Sr. NEPI purchased
       Romanian assets from CEEIF before the Peregrine Financial fraud
       came to light. Court filings establish that CEEIF and several
       subsidiary development & holding companies were utilized by
       Wasendorf Sr. to embezzle cash.
     * Despite having financial recourse for beneficial ownership of ~11%
       of CEEIF’s purported book value of >EUR 60m, Peregrine’s Receiver,
       Michael M. Eidelman, had no interest in pursuing these recoveries.
       Eidelman’s investigations alleged CEEIF was insolvent, did not
       discount asset values to CEEIF’s pro-rata minor stakes, hid assets
       and liabilities from its balance sheet, and had no audited
       financial statements. Given Pascariu’s involvement as a major
       shareholder and financier through Unicredit, at which he was
       chairman at the time, it would have to have been extremely
       neglectful to not detect this activity.
     * NEPI shareholders issued a written request on 8 August 2018 for an
       independent investigation into potential trading of associated
       companies, suspicious capital raising activity and property
       transactions. NEPI rejected demands for an independent
       investigation, instead establishing a subcommittee of its own
       members to investigate themselves, and their predecessors.
     * Even without considering the above points, NEPI is fundamentally
       overpriced when compared with peers.

   Based on our analysis, we see a significant downside to NEPI’s share
   price driven by an unwarranted overvaluation and the likelihood of
   substantially lower-than-reported earnings. Were NEPI to trade in-line
   with peers we believe shareholders would face an 25% downside, however,
   given the suspected extent of financial misrepresentation, we believe
   the company’s shares are worth substantially less.

   We believe stakeholders should reinforce their demands for an
   independent forensic investigation into the company’s operations and
   veracity of its financial consolidation and tax compliance. Until such
   time, Viceroy believe NEPI carries a high investment risk.

   For more research into the Resilient Stable, readers should refer to
   the leaked internal memo by 36One Asset Management which we believe was
   published around the end of 2017. A Scibd link to this report is below.
   Viceroy have no business relationship with 36One Asset Management and
   have never discussed NEPI Rockcastle with them.

   IFRAME:
   //www.scribd.com/embeds/394306255/content?start_page=1&view_mode=&acces
   s_key=key-sq4iPFzloN7D3BG1edSH

   View this document on Scribd

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 28/11/201828/11/2018Categories NEPI
   Rockcastle JSE:NRPLeave a comment on NEPI Rockcastle – Horsing around
   in the Stable

   Featured

MiMedx – Open Letter to MiMedx

   OCTOBER 15, 2018 – Request for investigation into perceived/potential
   conflict of interest.

   Viceroy – Open Letter to MiMedx

   On July 2, 2018 MiMedx announced the resignation of MiMedx CEO and
   Founder, Parker H. Petit, and the appointment of Mr. David Coles, a
   Managing Director of Alvarez & Marsal, as the company’s interim CEO.

   The appointment of Mr. Coles follows MiMedx’s engagement of KPMG and
   King & Spalding, who we understand have been tasked with, among other
   things, conducting an independent internal investigation into MiMedx
   sales practices .

   Viceroy understands that a key element of these internal investigations
   concerns MiMedx’s conduct with the United States Department of
   Veteran’s Affairs (DVA); specifically, the allegations of channel
   stuffing and the subsequent indictment of DVA physicians utilizing
   MiMedx products. These physicians are in the process of cooperating
   with the US Attorney General’s case in relation to the charges alleged
   in the criminal filings including receiving bribes and inducements, and
   over-use of MiMedx product within the VA.

   Viceroy Research has been made aware of links between other Alvarez &
   Marsal and a cohort of individuals allegedly exercising undue influence
   over the DVA, colloquially referred to as the “Mar-a-Lago Crowd”.

   Given the depth of investigations occurring at MiMedx relating to the
   company’s conduct with the DVA, Viceroy believe the appointment of
   Alvarez & Marsal represents an irremediable conflict of interest to
   MiMedx’s ongoing internal investigations, and to the investigations we
   understand are ongoing within the DVA and other federal regulatory
   entities.

   We have addressed a separate letter to the Department of Justice and
   the DVA’s ethics committee outlining what we believe is a serious
   conflict of interest and undue influence within the DVA of several
   parties.Further, we believe that it is irresponsible that this group,
   when exposed by journalists, was saved from a congressional hearing by
   longtime friend of former MiMedx CEO Petit, Senator Jonny Isakson, who
   has benefited greatly from donations from MiMedx and Petit.

   Enclosed is a brief report detailing our investigation into this
   matter. A more comprehensive report will be published post VA OIG
   approval. The PCAOB and Investigators has stated that “When an auditor
   is confronted with multiple indicators of problematic revenue
   recognition … he or she must get to the bottom of the relevant issues,
   including digging into management’s representations.” We stand ready to
   assist in this effort and sincerely appreciate your attention to this
   extremely important matter.

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 15/10/201809/04/2019Categories MiMedx
   NASDAQ:MDXGLeave a comment on MiMedx – Open Letter to MiMedx

   Featured

Pretium – Pretium Loses its General Manager

   Viceroy detail Pretium’s unannounced departure of Brucejack’s General
   Manager just 12 days after our initial report (NYSE:PVG).

   Download Link – Report

   SEPTEMBER 18, 2018 – Viceroy continues its coverage on Pretium
   Resources Inc. This report will detail what appears to be an exodus of
   personnel from Pretium since the start of the operation at the
   Brucejack mine.

   Notably, the General Manager of Pretium’s Brucejack mine, Kevin Torpy
   has just resigned from the company. This was not announced by Pretium,
   but instead by Torpy’s new employers: Titan Mining Corporation – a
   microcap zinc explorer – on 17 September 2018.

   Yet again it is left to Viceroy to inform Pretium stakeholders of key
   developments.

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 18/09/201809/04/2019Categories Pretium
   TSE/NYSE:PVGLeave a comment on Pretium – Pretium Loses its
   General Manager

   Featured

Pretium – Catch-22

   Viceroy addresses Pretium’s revised ARR and presents new evidence
   supporting overmining thesis. (PVG:TSX / PVG:NYSE)

   Download link – Pretium’s Catch 22

   SEPTEMBER 11, 2018 – On 6 September, 2018, Viceroy research published
   its first report on Pretium Resources detailing what we believe is a
   scheme to distort the company’s mining results and inflate the
   projected reserves of the company’s Brucejack mine.

   On September 10 Pretium issued a press release correcting its 2017
   Annual Reclamation Report, the contents of which were used in Viceroy’s
   original report. We believe this is a badly thought-out attempt at
   damage control for the following reasons:
     * Pretium’s new ARR figures are internally inconsistent and imply
       that Pretium misreported the Brucejack mine underground void by the
       volume of 140 Olympic-size swimming pools.
     * The decrease in the change of underground void volume continues to
       present major discrepancies to Pretium’s feasibility study,
       particularly around expected and historical bulk density figures
       obtained from the Brucejack mine
     * If investors choose to accept that no overmining has occurred, a
       Pandora’s box of serious operational issues continues to plague
       Pretium. Specifically, it becomes inexplicable that Pretium’s COGS
       and Capex have blown totally out of proportion and why explosive
       has dramatically exceeded expectation.
     * Viceroy present new evidence of accelerated mine development from
       comments by Pretium management in last week’s Rodman Conference.
       Pretium appear to have accelerated stoping by 18-24 months, moving
       well into the VOK lower zone well ahead of schedule. If investors
       choose to accept no overmining has occurred, Pretium’s accelerated
       mine development and excess dore recoveries imply the company is
       selectively mining high grade deposits, and has already exhausted a
       large portion of these in the VOK-lower/upper zones.
     * Viceroy present new evidence of excess waste generated by Pretium
       throughout its development phase. Pretium sought indefinite
       extension of time to dispose of excess waste in extracted from its
       mines. Viceroy’s consultants confirm This is further evidence that
       the rate of mining and development at Brucejack mine far exceeds
       the design of the mine site, given that as far back as 2015 it was
       clear that Pretium lacked the correct equipment to dispose of waste
       ore.

   Investors must seriously consider the implications of Pretium’s
   financial and operational figures should they choose to accept that no
   overmining has occurred. Further, they should question management as to
   their responses to our findings, instead of confining their responses
   to fireside chats with sell-side analysts.

   Viceroy continue to believe that Pretium’s grades will fall
   significantly, operating metrics/analysis has been distorted, and
   assets will be seized by its secured creditors as collateral as the
   company is overburdened by debt.

   Viceroy maintains its belief that Pretium’s equity is likely worthless.

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 11/09/201809/04/2019Categories Pretium
   TSE/NYSE:PVGLeave a comment on Pretium – Catch-22

   Featured

Pretium – Digging Up Dirt

   Distorted grades, involvement of SEC sanctioned entities, and high
   turnover of mineral consultants – Pretium flies many red flags.
   (PVG:TSX / PVG:NYSE)

   Download – Full Report

   Download – Summary

   SEPTEMBER 6, 2018 — Pretium Resources owns and operates the purportedly
   high-grade Brucejack gold mine in Northwest British Columbia in Canada.
   Viceroy is short Pretium Resources, as our research suggests its mining
   results have been distorted and the equity likely worthless as the
   overindebted company bleeds cash over the next 12 months:
     * Strathcona Mineral Services Limited (Strathcona), the mining
       consultancy that famously declared Bre-X to be a fraud, resigned
       from Pretium’s 2013 bulk sample program later stating, “…they will
       not have a mine producing 425,000 oz. a year for the next 20 years,
       as they have been advertising so far”. The entire Pretium
       investment thesis rests on the validity of the 2013 bulk sample
       program.
     * After Strathcona’s resignation, Pretium hired Strategic Minerals
       LLC (Strategic Minerals), an entity owned and managed by disgraced
       investment manager Serofim “Sima” Muroff to handle the testing of
       its bulk sample program. Muroff was charged by the SEC for
       securities fraud after misappropriating millions of dollars of
       investor funds and siphoning away millions more. Our research
       suggests that Muroff has knowingly assisted Pretium in overselling
       the quality of Brucejack Mine to investors.
     * The funds embezzled by Muroff were partially invested in numerous
       early-stage gold mining assets which to date have produced no gold.
       We believe Muroff’s entity was created to similarly distort gold
       grades for these gold mining assets. Muroff’s investors funds were
       also used to invest in equities and derivatives of other gold
       mining assets which we believe included Pretium.
     * The overwhelming majority of our research indicates Pretium
       manipulated the results of its bulk sample program through an over
       reliance on samples taken from the Cleopatra vein, thereby
       artificially inflating Pretium’s grades and reserve projections for
       the Brucejack Mine.
     * The manipulated bulk sampling test performed by Strategic Minerals
       was used by the courts in Wong v. Pretium Resources, 2017 as the
       basis of their decision that the Strathcona analysis was incorrect.
       This did not exempt the company from withholding Strathcona’s
       preliminary analysis from investors.
     * Government documents indicate Pretium is moving approximately
       double the tonnage from the underground mine than disclosed to
       investors. This suggests reported grades and reserves are
       significantly inflated, a much greater amount of waste is being
       dumped into local lakes, and more explosives are being utilized.
       Pretium’s operational plan has experienced dramatic changes in a
       short amount of time, leading us to believe that management is
       scrambling to find consistent, high-grade ore to maintain the
       charade that its debt and equity are viable.
     * Pretium founder and chairman, Robert Quartermain’s only mine
       operating experience at Pirquitas, an Argentinian silver mine owned
       by Silver Standard, resulted in a ~53% reserve cut and subsequent
       shutdown. A number of Quartermain’s management team left Silver
       Standard to operate Pretium.
     * As of Q2 2018, Pretium has ~US$700M of debt (excl. convertible
       notes) with an effective interest rate of ~15%. If Pretium can’t
       make or re-negotiate the payment, then Pretium may be unable to
       remain a going concern. We believe this deadline has provided an
       incentive for Pretium to inflate its results through the near-term
       depletion of the Cleopatra vein and take more rock out of the
       ground than disclosed and planned.

   The implications of our findings on grade, tonnage and life of mine are
   damning and lead us to believe that Pretium’s equity is highly likely
   to be worthless in its current state, and its credit significantly
   impaired.

   Viceroy believe Pretium bears striking resemblance to Rubicon Minerals,
   now operating as a shadow of its former self after revising mineral
   reserve estimates down ~90%.

   We believe the most likely scenario is that Pretium’s assets are seized
   by its secured creditors as collateral.

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 06/09/201809/04/2019Categories Pretium
   TSE/NYSE:PVGLeave a comment on Pretium – Digging Up Dirt

   Featured

Viceroy comment on Intellidex report

   12 July 2018 – So we can carry on writing our “prolific” research
   reports, here is Viceroy Research’s comment on the Intellidex report:

   PDF Download Link

   Intellidex <> Viceroy Correspondence

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 12/07/201812/07/2018Categories Capitec
   JSE:CPI, Steinhoff ETR/JSE:SNHLeave a comment on Viceroy comment on
   Intellidex report

   Featured

MiMedx – Filling In The Blanks

   More ties to Forest Park, active breach of federal sales regulations,
   knockback of “independent” research and the dead-on-arrival of
   international expansion.

   PDF Download Link

   The fraud at MiMedx continues to unravel as the company announced it
   would have to restate more than half a decade’s worth of financials,
   doctors receiving bribes from MiMedx and that its short selling
   commentary cannot be relied upon. Viceroy have identified further
   issues with the company including:
     * The announcement of MiMedx’s international expansion was a sad
       attempt at distracting investors from the Company’s compliance
       updates.
          + In the UK, the technology commentary from the National Health
            Service (NHS) appears very skeptical as to the efficiency and
            economic viability of MiMedx’s EpiFix product compared to
            existing solutions. EpiFix has been available in the UK for 2
            years as of January 2018, and the product was only stocked in
            1 NHS facility.
          + Viceroy Research have begun contacting international
            regulators to present evidence.
     * A major stumbling block to regulatory approval, as indicated by UK
       regulators, is the lack of independent research into MiMedx
       products’ efficacy and significant difference between company
       funded/sponsored reports and limited independent patient data.
     * Viceroy have uncovered an AmnioFix study conducted by Forest Park
       Medical Center employee, John Dulemba, and MiMedx consultant and
       former Matria healthcare Director of Clinical Research, Niki
       Istwan.
          + The study has no disclosures on compensation or relationships
            with MiMedx.
          + Istwan appears on multiple MiMedx studies sometimes as a
            MiMedx consultant and other times as an “independent”. We
            believe this obfuscation of relationships to the company is
            intentional and used by MiMedx to create an illusion of
            independence. MiMedx does not report payments to Doctors
            despite the legal requirements.
     * One of three individuals recently indicted for fraudulently
       accepting payments from MiMedx was also part of a clinical study
       into MiMedx products. The implication that MiMedx clinical research
       is directly influenced by the Company is likely to deter
       international approval altogether. More so for paying bribes to
       Doctors. MiMedx denied paying bribes or inducements in legal
       filings and illegal short selling commentary, but the Grand Jury
       disagrees.
     * MiMedx is in breach of federal procurement regulations (FAR/DFAR)
       due to the conditioning of settlement agreements and litigation
       settlements with former employees and whistleblowers on a
       requirement for withdrawal of complaints to, and prohibition of
       communication with, regulatory authorities. We have reported this
       to the relevant authorities and believe their findings will
       corroborate our own.

   For further background on this issue, please refer to Viceroy’s MiMedx
   Greatest Hits report:

   https://viceroyresearch.org/2018/05/11/viceroys-mimedx-greatest-hits/

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 25/06/201809/04/2019Categories MiMedx
   NASDAQ:MDXGLeave a comment on MiMedx – Filling In The Blanks

   Featured

MiMedx – No Comment

   Viceroy are happy to report that, as of this morning, MiMedx has
   removed ~50 incriminating “short selling commentary” responses to
   critics, including Viceroy Research, Aurelius Value, Marc Cohodes,
   journalists and employees.

   PDF Download Link

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 08/06/2018Categories MiMedx
   NASDAQ:MDXGLeave a comment on MiMedx – No Comment

   Featured

Capitec – 2018 Earnings Analysis

   It is our belief that Capitec management have continued to mislead
   investors since our previous correspondence with the company.

   End-of-financial-year announcements in 2018 are reflective
   deteriorating business conditions and corroborate the continuity of
   several intentionally misleading accounting practices we have reported
   in the past.

   We have again entertained Capitec’s invitation to field questions
   regarding its business.

   An open letter to Capitec’s Audit Committee can be downloaded below:

   Viceroy Letter to Audit Committee – PDF Download

   In this instance, we are addressing the audit committee with our
   concerns, as they relate to broader financial reporting transparency
   and flawed management analysis, corroborating our previous analysis of
   unsustainable business practices.

   Our continued review of Capitec’s practices and financial results leads
   us to believe management’s delivery of analysis to stakeholders is
   extremely misleading, and not at all reflective of declining business
   fundamentals.

   This report will follow issues we have raised in previous reports and
   correspondence with management. You can find all of these reports on
   our website:

   https://viceroyresearch.org/category/capitec-jsecpi/

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 21/05/201809/04/2019Categories Capitec
   JSE:CPILeave a comment on Capitec – 2018 Earnings Analysis

   Featured

MiMedx – Viceroy’s MiMedx Greatest Hits

   Over the past eight months, Viceroy have conducted an investigation
   into MiMedx Group, Inc (NASDAQ:MDXG). We have presented our research
   over the course of 20+ reports which can be on our website.

   In the interest of those who have only recently begun following the
   story, Viceroy have decided to consolidate the major aspects of all 20+
   reports into one document, organized by topic.

   PDF Download Link – Greatest Hits MDXG

   This is still a lengthy document however readers should be conscious
   that it is a combination of over 20 separate reports, which
   collectively is still small sample of the hoard of data Viceroy have
   provided to regulators.

   When we began our investigation into MiMedx we were shocked by the
   sheer volume, brazenness, extent and historic precedence of the fraud
   being perpetrated by the company. MiMedx management has yet to
   acknowledge any wrongdoing, remaining unrepentant despite the existence
   of several federal investigations into the company.

   We reiterate our opinion that due to the overwhelming nature and amount
   of evidence against the company we believe MiMedx is a robust fraud,
   entirely uninvestable, and worth $0.00.

   We encourage any persons with further evidence of fraud within MiMedx’s
   operations to lodge an anonymous report with regulators through the
   following channel.

   https://www.sec.gov/whistleblower/submit-a-tip

   Alternatively, Viceroy are happy to take the heat on publishing more
   evidence of malpractice at MiMedx, which we will treat with the utmost
   level of confidentiality. You can reach us at
   viceroyresearch@gmail.com.

   Further reading on MiMedx’s criminal activity can also be found on:

   www.petiteparkerthebarker.com

   www.aureliusvalue.com

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 11/05/201809/04/2019Categories MiMedx
   NASDAQ:MDXGLeave a comment on MiMedx – Viceroy’s MiMedx Greatest Hits

   Featured

AMD – AMD confirms CTS vulnerabilities, downplaying to avoid the
financial implications

   Discoveries by CTS Labs’ research into AMD flaws eliminate AMD’s
   competitive advantage in enterprise server segments and the company’s
   price competitiveness in retail aspects can no longer be justified.

   PDF Download Link
   The company’s rhetoric is that this is a non-issue hinges on the
   non-argument that administrator access must be established in order to
   exploit the vulnerabilities identified by CTS. This is short-sighted as
   the surrounding statement that most hackers will not have the know-how
   to exploit these vulnerabilities.
   CTS have recently released a video showing the exploitation of AMD’s
   vulnerabilities to completely circumvent Windows Credential Guard and
   obtain decrypted passwords. AMD management specifically highlighted
   Windows Credential Guard as a key obstacle to the execution of CTS
   Labs’ identified exploits.
   The video can be viewed in full here:
   https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8YQaWIWbzhI&feature=youtu.be
   Viceroy believes the practice of giving AMD discretion as to when, if
   and how it reports its own vulnerabilities facilitates poor corporate
   disclosure and keeps stakeholders in the dark. This is not how free
   financial markets operate for a reason and is validated by the SEC’s
   most recent statement relating to cybersecurity flaws: we would
   similarly not give fraudulent companies the discretion as to if and
   when they inform their investors they are a fraud.
     * Ryzen and Epyc processors facilitate tremendous freedom of access
       to customer’s data –The identified vulnerabilities in AMD’s EPYC
       and Ryzen processors give hackers the ability to entrench malware
       at the hardware level, making them virtually undetectable and
       untouchable by security products. By abusing these vulnerabilities
       at the Secure Processor level, malware characteristics can give
       hackers unlimited control over entire networks. None of the
       vulnerabilities identified by CTS, both firmware and hardware,
       require physical access to computers to be exploited. The continued
       sale of these processors puts customers at significant risk.
     * The security protocols that AMD have been promoting put customers
       at unacceptable risk to vulnerabilities identified by CTS – We
       expect AMD cloud customers including Microsoft Azure, Baidu,
       DellEMC and TenCent will flee in the short term given the serious
       nature of chip flaws. AMD is unlikely to be trusted in this space
       again.
     * One Ryzen chip could endanger an entire enterprise network –
       Vulnerabilities identified in the Ryzen chip allow hackers to
       perform credential dumps on infected Ryzen workstations even if the
       latest security mitigations are employed. Malware can quickly
       spread to other workstations throughout enterprise networks,
       regardless of whether they use a Ryzen chip or Intel. No prudent
       CISO or CTO will risk their network or their security by buying a
       Ryzen chip over more secure competitors.

   This report expands on the financial impact of the CTS Labs
   vulnerabilities, specifically the impact of future earnings and
   possible legal liabilities that Viceroy believes will arise against the
   company. Viceroy have appointed lawyers to assess the reliability of
   the security claims made by AMD considering the basic level flaws that
   have been identified.

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 22/03/201809/04/2019Categories MiMedx
   NASDAQ:MDXGLeave a comment on AMD – AMD confirms CTS vulnerabilities,
   downplaying to avoid the financial implications

   Featured

AMD – The Obituary

   Viceroy analyze CTS Labs’ report exposing fatal security
   vulnerabilities across AMD products

   PDF Download Link

   CTS Labs, a cyber-security research firm, released its findings on
   http://www.amdflaws.com. These findings demonstrate that AMD’s key
   products, and it basis for profitability and growth, the EPYC and Ryzen
   processors, contain severe and pervasive security flaws that put users
   and organizations at an unacceptable and damaging risk. We understand
   that these flaws are difficult, some practically impossible, to patch.
   We believe that AMD was compelled to release products as quickly and
   cheaply as possible as it was falling behind its competitors. This has
   led to what appears to be complete oversight or negligence of security
   fundamentals of AMD’s products, which promote an evidently misguided
   competitive advantage – particularly with its Secure Processor (a.k.a.
   Platform Security Processor or PSP) – of providing “the greatest peace
   of mind on every AMD product.”. Nothing could be further from the
   truth.
   Viceroy, in consultation with experts, have evaluated CTS’s report. We
   believe the issues identified by CTS are fatal to AMD on a commercial
   level, and outright dangerous at an international level.
   In light of CTS’s discoveries, the meteoric rise of AMD’s stock price
   now appears to be totally unjustified and entirely unsustainable. We
   believe AMD is worth $0.00 and will have no choice but to file for
   Chapter 11 (Bankruptcy) in order to effectively deal with the
   repercussions of recent discoveries.

   Date: 13 Mar 2018

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 13/03/2018Categories AMD
   NASDAQ:AMDLeave a comment on AMD – The Obituary

   Featured

ProSieben – TV’s Real House of Cards

   ProSieben’s (ETR:PSM) growth story is a lie: earnings manipulation,
   huge put liabilities.

   PDF Download Link

   ProSiebensat.1 Media SE (ProSieben) is a European media company focused
   in the German-speaking TV and digital market. The company’s core
   business is advertising-financed free TV, supplemented by digital
   segments built by a diversification campaign over the last half-decade.

   Diversification has proven a costly and ultimately unsuccessful
   strategy. Viceroy believes ProSieben is a highly leveraged entity with
   non-performing subsidiaries offering no synergies. ProSieben’s core
   business – which has carried ProSieben’s investment losses – appears to
   be in accelerating decline, with a potential death knell spurred by the
   EU’s implementation of its General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR).
     * ProSieben’s acquisition and expansion strategy has been
       catastrophic, unfocused, and expensive – the company is currently
       attempting to control the damage caused. Many expensive investments
       are loss-making, hidden through segment accounting gimmickry, and
       offer no synergies. It is unlikely that ProSieben will be able to
       offset losses through divestment. There is no clear rhyme or reason
       to their business and such disjointed segments have proven
       difficult to manage and integrate.
     * Viceroy believes ProSieben’s non-cash barter transactions have
       artificially boosted revenues by EUR210m in 2016: almost 50% of net
       income. Viceroy believe ProSieben’s media-for-equity and
       media-for-revenue transactions will never be realized in cash
       because investments have been pulled from the bottom of the barrel.
       Despite classifying these transactions as revenue items, ProSieben
       does not appear to adjust its operating cash flows to reflect this
       non-cash item, as equity/investments are inherently not a
       working-capital account.
     * ProSieben has subsidized a fabricated digital “growth story” using
       cash flows from its TV advertising business and idle TV advertising
       inventory. As its core business declines, ProSieben can no longer
       counterbalance its under-performing digital segments – the earnings
       structure is on the verge of collapse.
     * Significant unmet financing needs and dividend commitments far
       outweigh ProSieben’s cash flows. We believe shareholders will
       inevitably be subject to increasingly dilutive equity raises.
       Outstanding among these are ProSieben’s acquisition-related put
       liabilities which amounted to EUR366m as of EOFY 2016.
     * ProSieben’s unconditional put liabilities have the characteristics
       of former management “bonuses” which bypass the consolidated income
       statement and stagger the company’s cash outflows (despite being
       unconditional). This allows ProSieben to consolidate entities
       (through majority ownership) without full cash outlay and
       minimizing P&L effects.
     * ProSieben has lost at least 14 senior executives & board members in
       2017 alone. It is very telling that almost the entire
       finance-related management team has left the company within that
       period. It seems the people most familiar with the true financial
       state of ProSieben have jumped ship. The collective Executive Board
       and Supervisory Board directly hold a mere 65,244 shares in
       ProSieben as of December 31, 2017. This is equivalent to 0.0% of
       the share capital.
     * ProSieben is locked-in to new “output deal” contracts with major US
       studios to the tune of EUR3,022m which it acknowledges does not
       meet the appetite of German viewers. Viceroy believe this will
       substantially increase costs in a declining market – a
       margin-trimming exercise.
     * The head of ProSieben’s M&A team who processed an acquisition was
       employed by the seller a short period after. Viceroy believe the
       transaction was extremely favorable to the sellers.
     * The Company’s dividend rates are fiscally irresponsible and
       unsustainable. Viceroy believes the capital raise in November 2016
       which followed a large dividend payout was totally nonsensical.

   Viceroy believes that ProSieben will be forced to issue another capital
   raise or cancel its dividend to zero to deal with these problems.

   ProSieben displays all the signs of a business in an advanced state of
   decay in every operating segment. Viceroy believes that these issues
   have gone unattended for too long, and a correction is imminent as
   ProSieben’s market becomes stressed.

   We value ProSieben at EUR 7.51 per share, representing a 75% downside
   on the closing price at March 5, 2018.


   *Edit – 6 Mar 2018 – Correction on Figure 1.

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 06/03/201809/04/2019Categories
   ProSieben ETR:PSMLeave a comment on ProSieben – TV’s Real House
   of Cards

   Featured

Capitec – Capitec’s inadequate response to Viceroy

   A perfect example of why Viceroy don’t “engage with management” – they
   don’t answer our questions.

   PDF Download Link

   Viceroy issued an open letter to Capitec’s board of directors on 20
   February 2018, responding to their invitation to engage with management
   and field our questions.

   A full copy of our letter can be found here:

   www.viceroyresearch.files.wordpress.com/2018/02/letter-to-capitec-20-02
   -18.pdf

   Capitec replied to our letter on 22 February, 2018 via email, however
   provided no straightforward responses to any of our questions. At best,
   Viceroy received numerous largely insignificant statistics and
   tangential statements.

   Capitec’s full response to our letter is attached to this report as
   Annexure 1.

   Viceroy has been criticized for not engaging with management prior to
   publication of our reports. Capitec’s response is a prime example of
   why we choose not to. We maintain our recommendation that Capitec
   should be subject to an external, independent regulatory investigation,
   which we believe will result in Capitec being placed in curatorship in
   order to protect its consumers.

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 05/03/201809/04/2019Categories Capitec
   JSE:CPILeave a comment on Capitec – Capitec’s inadequate response
   to Viceroy

   Featured

MiMedx – The curious case of Mad River Community Hospital

   Viceroy present further evidence of MiMedx illegally selling on
   reimbursement, adding our already extensive evidence of pervasive
   fraud.

   PDF Download Link

   Viceroy has obtained documents detailing a legal dispute between MiMedx
   and Mad River Community Hospital (“Mad River”). The documents clearly
   outline MiMedx’s fraudulent sales methods including misrepresenting
   reimbursement rates for products and “marketing the spread”.

   This report details the serious misconduct and underhanded sales
   tactics of MiMedx personnel in California, which executive management
   were certainly aware of given the ensuing litigation. As we have
   demonstrated over 20+ reports, these types of improprieties are
   commonplace throughout the organization. Never before have our legal
   advisers or consultants come across such gross and serious misconduct.

   The Mad River documents also show MiMedx engaged in “selling on
   reimbursement”, contrary to a several laws and regulations and some
   alleged MiMedx policies.
     * MiMedx sued Mad River for non-payment of invoices for EpiFix and
       AmnioFix products. Unfortunately for MiMedx this is where the story
       becomes compelling for law enforcement and regulators.
     * MiMedx misrepresented to Mad River the reimbursement rates for its
       EpiFix and AmnioFix products, as well as misrepresenting insurer’s
       attitudes towards these products. Several insurers considered
       MiMedx products “experimental and un-reimbursable”.
     * Following Mad River’s failure to pay, MiMedx sent “reimbursement”
       specialists to Mad River who upheld that MiMedx’s represented
       reimbursement rates were correct. Mad River believes that this was
       simply a manner of continuing the ruse while raising further
       invoices.

   The Mad River filings portray (we believe accurately) MiMedx as
   third-rate con-artists.

   Contrary to Parker H. Petite’s rhetoric of “Good Business Acumen” and
   persistent denials of “marketing the spread”, this report will unlawful
   practices that MiMedx, including “marketing the spread”. This is the
   very tip of the iceberg that law enforcement and regulators have been
   made aware of.

   It is Viceroy’s intention to continue the dialogue with MiMedx’s
   auditors and regulators to bring about the prosecution of Parker H.
   Petit.

   In the wake of mounting evidence of fraud, illegal revenue recognition
   systems, retaliation against whistleblowers and concealing evidence
   from investors, we immediately call for Parker H. Petit’s resignation.

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 22/02/201809/04/2019Categories MiMedx
   NASDAQ:MDXGLeave a comment on MiMedx – The curious case of Mad River
   Community Hospital

   Featured

Capitec – Viceroy’s open letter to Capitec

   Capitec has opened an invitation to address Viceroy’s questions.

   We believe our reports have clearly conveyed our concerns with Capitec,
   but have happily condensed our research into questions.

   Letter to Capitec – PDF Download Link

   We look forward to Capitec’s response.


   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 20/02/201809/04/2019Categories Capitec
   JSE:CPILeave a comment on Capitec – Viceroy’s open letter to Capitec

   Featured

Capitec – Viceroy responds to Capitec

   On January 30, 2018 Viceroy Research released our report on Capitec
   (JSE:CPI) citing a need for large impairments and regulatory
   intervention.

   The issues expressed by Viceroy have been reflected in a letter from
   Benguela Global Fund Managers to Capitec also raising concerns about
   Capitec’s lending practices[1]. This report presents the results of
   Viceroy’s further investigation into Capitec and a rebuttal of
   Capitec’s responses to Viceroy and Benguela.

   PDF Download Link
     * Since the publication of our last report, Capitec has disclosed
       that an extraordinarily large portion of its subprime, highly
       indebted customers who miss payments on their loans are somehow
       able to find the money to “catch up” or “cure” their arrears. This
       is suspicious.
          + Numerous former Capitec staff and 5 prominent debt counselling
            firms with proprietary datasets on South African unsecured
            lending support our thesis that this “curing” method is how
            Capitec hides the disastrous underlying performance of its
            loan book. If a borrower in arrears is able to beg or borrow
            the funds from a secondary lender to pay down their arrears
            and make themselves “current”, Capitec immediately offers them
            a new, larger loan. The borrowers use this new, larger Capitec
            loan to pay off the secondary lender used to cover the
            arrears.
          + Analysis of tens of thousands of Capitec borrowers’ datasets
            within debt counselling firms show consumers were able to get
            new loans after paying down their arrears the day prior. Thus,
            we can state empirically that this practice is still
            occurring. We contrast this with the lending criteria of a
            Standard Bank or Absa where there is a “cooling off” period
            before a borrower formerly in arrears can seek a new loan – to
            prevent exactly this behavior. By offering upsized loans to
            people who have just cleared their arrears, Capitec management
            is able to say with a straight face that they do “not lend
            into arrears”. This is TRUE in fact – but not in substance.
          + While the borrower is getting more and more indebted and is
            still unable to pay their debts, lending to people who were
            immediately prior in allows Capitec to artificially generate
            “cures”, unsustainably increase its loan book, charge massive
            initiation fees and create a façade of quality within its
            consumer base.
          + Well over half (70% – 80%) of Capitec consumers in debt
            counselling were issued new loans prior to repaying their
            existing loans.
     * Viceroy have obtained communications from Capitec Head Office dated
       8 February 2018 to local branches advising that it has amended the
       number of allowable loans per customer. Reading between the lines,
       Capitec appear to be tightening or relaxing lending rules in order
       to achieve the greatest possible return as opposed to the consumers
       ability to repay those loans.
     * Viceroy has obtained evidence of Capitec intentionally abusing the
       debit order system to ensure its debits take priority ahead of
       other lenders.
     * Following the publication of our last statement several media
       outlets have reported on CEO Gerrie Fourie’s purchase of ZAR 1.5m
       of Capitec shares on the open market, presenting this as a show of
       faith in the company. We believe this is intentionally
       narrow-minded when viewed in the context of the net market sale of
       ZAR 49m worth of Capitec shares by Fourie in 2017. Collectively,
       directors sold ZAR 406m Capitec shares on market in 2017 alone.
     * We respond systematically to Capitec’s poorly constructed rebuttal
       of our prior report.

   Capitec’s behavior has led to material overstatement of the quality of
   the book and substantial under-provisioning. We note the South African
   Reserve Bank (SARB) described Capitec as being liquid and solvent on
   the basis “of the available information”. Evidence suggests the
   available information is being deliberately distorted by Capitec
   management and we believe that as a matter of prudential supervision
   the SARB must investigate the lending practices at Capitec. We are
   providing this data to SARB and the NCR.

   Viceroy continues to believe that Capitec is fundamentally uninvestable
   and reiterate our recommendation that an investigation by an
   independent body is launched in the face of the evidence presented in
   our research.

   [1]
   https://www.biznews.com/sa-investing/2018/01/31/capitec-benguela-vicero
   y/

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 14/02/201809/04/2019Categories Capitec
   JSE:CPILeave a comment on Capitec – Viceroy responds to Capitec

   Featured

Capitec – Viceroy comments on SARB statement

   Viceroy comments on information available to the South African Reserve
   Bank regarding Capitec:

   PDF Download Link

   In response to Viceroy’s recent report on Capitec (JSE:CPI), the South
   African Reserve Bank (SARB) decided to vouch for Capitec. Indeed, it
   decided to stake its reputation on the accuracy of the company’s
   accounts. Below is their statement in full:

   “The South African Reserve Bank (SARB) notes a report by a US based
   fund manager. As part of our mandate, we monitor the safety and
   soundness of all banks, including Capitec Bank Limited (Capitec).
   According to all the information available, Capitec is solvent, well
   capitalised and has adequate liquidity. The bank meets all prudential
   requirements.”

   The South African Reserve Bank has a responsibility to determine
   whether the information provided to them – and on which they base their
   regulatory decisions is accurate. We do not think it is.

   The SARB has, at this point, a responsibility to perform a full
   regulatory inspection of Capitec. Viceroy remains firm in its belief
   that this will result in SARB placing Capitec into curatorship.

   Viceroy will shortly respond to Capitec’s press release in relation to
   our report.



   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 05/02/201809/04/2019Categories Capitec
   JSE:CPILeave a comment on Capitec – Viceroy comments on SARB statement

   Featured

Capitec – A wolf in sheep’s clothing

   PDF Download Link

   Based on our research and due diligence, we believe that Capitec is a
   loan shark with massively understated defaults masquerading as a
   community microfinance provider. We believe that the South African
   Reserve Bank & Minister of Finance should immediately place Capitec
   into curatorship.

   Capitec Bank Holdings Limited (JSE: CPI) is a South Africa-focused
   microfinance provider to a majority low-income demographic, yet they
   out-earn all major commercial banks globally including competing
   high-risk lenders. We don’t buy this story. Viceroy believes this is
   indicative of predatory finance which we have corroborated with
   substantial on-the-ground discussions with Capitec ex-employees, former
   customers, and individuals familiar with the business.

   Viceroy’s extensive due diligence and compiled evidence suggests that
   indicates Capitec must take significant impairments to its loans which
   will likely result in a net-liability position. We believe Capitec’s
   concealed problems largely resemble those seen at African Bank
   Investments (JSE: AXL) prior to its collapse in 2014.

   We think that it’s only a matter of time before Capitec’s financials
   and business unravel, with macro headwinds creating an exponential risk
   of default and bankruptcy.

   This report will provide underlying information and analysis we believe
   supports the following conclusions:
     * Reconciliation of loan book values, maturity profiles and cash
       outflows imply Capitec is either fabricating new loans and
       collections, or re-financing ~ZAR 2.5bn – 3bn (US$200m-$240m) in
       principal per year by issuing new loans to defaulting clients.
     * Legal documents obtained by Viceroy show Capitec advising and
       approving loans to delinquent customers in order to repay existing
       loans. These documents also show Capitec engaging in reckless
       lending practices as defined by South Africa’s National Credit Act.
       This corroborates Viceroy’s loan book analysis.
     * As a consequence of re-financing delinquent loans, Viceroy believes
       Capitec’s loan book is massively overstated. Viceroy’s analysis
       against competitors suggests an impairment/write-off impact of ZAR
       11bn will more accurately represent the delinquencies and risk in
       Capitec’s portfolio.
     * Legal experts that we have spoken to believe that the outcome of an
       upcoming reckless and predatory lending test case in March 2018
       will be used to trigger a multi-party litigation refund (class
       action). We believe that, at a minimum, Capitec will be required to
       refund predatory origination fees primarily related to multi-loan
       facilities; an estimated ZAR 12.7bn.
     * Viceroy’s investigations suggest that Capitec’s prohibited and
       discontinued multi-loan facility lives on, rebranded as a “Credit
       Facility”. Former Capitec employees have corroborated this. Despite
       its perception as an affordable lender, Capitec’s implied interest
       rates are significantly true of the maximum allowable rates in
       South Africa.
     * South Africa’s microfinancing sector has been the graveyard of
       numerous Capitec competitors who chased the same meteoric growth
       Capitec displays, largely due to low acceptance criteria and mass
       delinquencies. We see no operational difference between Capitec and
       its ill-fated predecessors, including African Bank.
     * Former employees consider the business to still be an outright
       loan-shark operation, where fees are key. Some former employees
       believe they were fired for not deceiving borrowers and failing to
       meet rescheduling targets on impaired/defaulting loans.
     * Jean Pierre Verster, chairman of Capitec’s audit committee, is/was
       indirectly short Capitec through Steinhoff. We believe this is an
       oversight, and understand Verster to be an excellent analyst on the
       short side. We encourage Verster to raise the concerns within this
       report to company auditors and recognize Capitec’s resemblance to
       his previous African Bank short.

   Given what we believe is a massive overstatement of financial assets
   and income, together with opaque reporting of loan cash flow and
   reckless lending practices, we believe Capitec is simply uninvestable
   and accordingly have not assigned a target price.

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 30/01/201809/04/2019Categories Capitec
   JSE:CPILeave a comment on Capitec – A wolf in sheep’s clothing

   Featured

MiMedx – As promised: MiMedx’s concealed documents

   This post highlights the incriminating testimonies from MiMedx
   employees, associated entities and attorneys, which have subsequently
   been sealed by the company to conceal evidence from stakeholders.

   The order to seal these documents came only after Viceroy’s highlighted
   that AvKare “didn’t do anything”, according to Mike Carlton (MiMedx VP
   of Global Sales), but only served to facilitate MiMedx’s channel
   stuffing & other suspicious activities. Parker H. Petit, knew investors
   would quickly realize he was misleading them – the information was
   incriminating MiMedx if left unsealed.

   Parker H. Petit & MiMedx continuously attempt to sweep criminal actions
   and contradictory statements under the rug – in this instance, they
   sealed incriminating deposition transcripts. Fortunately, Viceroy had
   already obtained these records prior to the motion to seal bring filed
   with the court.

   We are disclosing the documents in the public interest:

   43-main

   43-1

   43-2

   43-3

   43-4

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 28/12/201709/04/2019Categories MiMedx
   NASDAQ:MDXGTags Channel Stuffing, Department of Veterans Affairs, DOJ,
   DVA, Fraud, MDXG, MDXG cover up, MiMedx, SECLeave a comment on MiMedx –
   As promised: MiMedx’s concealed documents

   Featured

MiMedx – Viceroy activates “The Honeypot”: Parker H. Petit & MiMedx
caught red-handed

   New insights on MiMedx instructions to physicians on how to
   fraudulently increase compensation.

   Following the release of our previous report titled “Viceroy release
   MiMedx EOB emails”, Viceroy Research have been contacted by physicians
   corroborating MiMedx’s role in distributing EOB to fraudulently
   increase Medicare reimbursement. This occurs through the
   reclassification of AmnioFix products as EpiFix products in order to
   obtain Medicare reimbursements.

   PDF Download Link

   MiMedx’s recent nonsensical responses to our research have been evasive
   and does not acknowledge that at its core, the practice construes
   Medicare fraud. In order to demonstrate this, Viceroy set a Honeypot.
   MiMedx in their desperation to mislead investors, have taken our bait.

   While the issue of reclassifying MiMedx product to exploit federal
   billing facilities was a major issue, there was another underlying
   element to the EOB.

   Consider the following: in principle, Medicare reimbursements cover 80%
   of the cost of any treatment used as well as 80% of the Medicare
   application fee. Typically, this means a reduced payment for the
   patient, however by utilizing a larger graft than is necessary a
   physician can be reimbursed more than the cost of treatment.

   Per the Rosenberger email, how can MiMedx justify physicians PROFITING
   from Medicare when system is intended to cover a PORTION of costs?

   Viceroy yesterday showed MiMedx has zero credibility regarding their
   statements. Previously MiMedx had state to investors AvKare wasn’t an
   intermediary, controlled sales and it was all lies. MiMedx know full
   well what the implications of Mike Carlton’s deposition under oath
   means. There is no commentary, statements issued by MiMedx are purely
   intended to manipulate a situation where blind and naive analysts
   continue to promote the stock.

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 14/12/201709/04/2019Categories MiMedx
   NASDAQ:MDXGLeave a comment on MiMedx – Viceroy activates “The
   Honeypot”: Parker H. Petit & MiMedx caught red-handed

   Featured

MiMedx – MiMedx continue to consciously mislead investors, defame Viceroy and
Marc Cohodes

   AvKare just “made it easier” for former Advanced BioHealing agents to
   stuff federal customers with MiMedx product

   PDF Download Link

   Viceroy present indisputable proof that Parker H. Petit has been
   misleading investors and defaming Marc Cohodes & Viceroy.

   Mike Carlton, VP of Global Sales, was under oath giving a deposition
   about MiMedx’s relationship with Mid-South Biologics, who are suing
   MiMedx regarding contractual issues. Parker H. Petit and MiMedx
   attorneys would have known that during the deposition, Mike Carlton
   said this:

   “AvKare didn’t sell the product. They didn’t do anything. They just
   made it easier to sell.”

   Interestingly, when Viceroy and Marc Cohodes echoed this statement, we
   were met by a barrage of lies and a law suit from MiMedx who want to
   falsely asset our reports are factually inaccurate.

   For the analysts that can find ‘no credible evidence of wrong-doing’,
   we recommend they review filings for all cases MiMedx are involved in.

   Today’s focus is on case is Mid-South Biologics LLC (Pla) Vs. MiMedx
   Group Inc (Def) – Reference: Case 2:17-cv-02028-JTF-egb   Document
   43-3   Filed 12/04/17. The deposition was taken on the 13th Day of
   October 2017.

   Parker H. Petit and Mike Carlton are advised that we have forwarded
   this information to the SEC. Investors should be aware of the lengths
   MiMedx will go to mislead and misinform its shareholders

   As a recap:

   Analysts who can blindly find no credible evidence of wrong-doing
   should seriously review Viceroy’s reports and MiMedx’s own
   documentation showing channel-stuffing, fake revenue recognition, ‘free
   evaluation products’, breaches to anti-kickback statutes and many more
   violations.

   As previously reported, MiMedx is being investigated by Regulators, it
   would be prudent for the sellside to conduct their own investigation
   instead of relying on a “binary outcome” in relation to allegations of
   fraud.

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 13/12/201709/04/2019Categories MiMedx
   NASDAQ:MDXGLeave a comment on MiMedx – MiMedx continue to consciously
   mislead investors, defame Viceroy and Marc Cohodes

   Featured

MiMedx – Viceroy release MiMedx EOB emails

   Viceroy has obtained emails instructing physicians how to falsify
   MiMedx Q-codes to fraudulently increase reimbursement.

   PDF Download Link

   Viceroy have obtained printouts of emails sent from MiMedx employees
   specifically instructing physicians on how to fraudulently increase
   Medicare reimbursement.

   An EOB document titled “EpiFix – Made Easy” has been sent to Viceroy,
   which appears to be advice from MiMedx to physicians on how to receive
   Medicare reimbursements for their product.

   One problem: this advice was provided to surgical clients; whose
   products are ineligible for Medicare reimbursement.

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 11/12/201709/04/2019Categories MiMedx
   NASDAQ:MDXGLeave a comment on MiMedx – Viceroy release MiMedx
   EOB emails

   Featured

Steinhoff – Steinhoff’s skeletons: off-balance sheet entities inflating
earnings, obscuring losses

   Viceroy is pleased to release its research report on Steinhoff
   International Holdings NV.

   PDF Download Link

   Steinhoff (SNH) has long been under scrutiny for seemingly inexplicable
   factors including:
     * A long string of acquisitions of stagnating or deteriorating
       businesses whose performance seems to miraculously improve
       post-acquisition, even if only on paper;
     * Cash flow trends that do not correspond to EBITDA;
     * Investigations into senior executives for tax-evasion, document
       forgery and fraud; and
     * Rampant and dilutive equity raising.

   Viceroy’s investigation into Steinhoff has revealed several concerning
   activities surrounding a number of at least two off-balance sheet,
   undisclosed related party entities:
     * Campion Capital
     * Southern View Finance

   While the existence of some of these entities has been reported by the
   media, their activities have not. Viceroy’s analysis suggests Steinhoff
   uses these off-balance sheet vehicles to artificially inflate earnings:
     * Steinhoff has issued expensive loans to, and booked interest
       revenue against, Campion subsidiaries for the purchase of
       loss-making Steinhoff subsidiaries. These revenues will never
       translate to cash.
     * Steinhoff has moved two loss-making and predatory consumer loan
       providers to off-balance sheet entities: JD Consumer Finance and
       Capfin.
     * Steinhoff negotiated the re-purchase of the only profitable
       portions of JD and Capfin (loan administration and debt collection
       facilities) while allowing losses to be incurred at off-balance
       sheet, related-party entities under Campion Capital.

   Given these loss-making entities such as Southern View Finance UK, are
   being round tripped back to Steinhoff, Viceroy believe it is possible
   that Steinhoff are “repaying” Campion’s outlays through acquisition
   premiums (i.e. losses are being capitalized through round-trip
   transactions with related parties).

   Viceroy believes that, based on the contents of this report, Steinhoff
   should consolidate Campion Capital and its subsidiaries given that
   Steinhoff bears full economic liability for these entities through loan
   arrangements and exert total control through overlapping management.

   Viceroy believes the facts presented in this report will bring
   Steinhoff’s behavior to the attention of regulatory authorities.

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 06/12/201709/04/2019Categories
   Steinhoff ETR/JSE:SNHLeave a comment on Steinhoff – Steinhoff’s
   skeletons: off-balance sheet entities inflating earnings,
   obscuring losses

   Featured

MiMedx – MiMedx now under investigation by DOJ enforcement & VA

   Viceroy has received responses to two Freedom of Information Act (FOIA)
   requests lodged after the publication of our initial report, one from
   the Department of Veterans Affairs and the other to the Department of
   Justice.

   PDF Download Link
   Both agencies withheld all requested documents under 5 U.S. Code § 552
   5(b)(7)(A), which provides an exemption for agencies to make available
   public documents as it could “reasonably be expected to interfere with
   enforcement proceedings.”

   Viceroy now believe MiMedx is under formal investigation by the
   Department of Justice, the Department of Veterans Affairs and the
   Securities and Exchanges Commission.

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 30/11/201709/04/2019Categories MiMedx
   NASDAQ:MDXGTags Department of Justice, Department of Veterans Affairs,
   DOJ, DVA, Fraud, MDXG, MiMedxLeave a comment on MiMedx – MiMedx now
   under investigation by DOJ enforcement & VA

   Featured

MiMedx – Caught red-handed circumventing VA regulations

   Viceroy’s latest report reveals emails between the VA and MiMedx show
   MiMedx employees were instructed to circumvent VA policy regarding
   consignment agreements.

   PDF Download Link

   Viceroy obtained a series of emails between MiMedx employees and VA
   personnel. These emails are focused on the arrangement of consignment
   inventory, contrary to VA hospital regulations at the time. The issue
   comes to a head when a VA supervisor decides to hold MiMedx responsible
   for repeatedly sending product that was not ordered. The VA have been
   made aware of these and other emails with a report of concern.

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 21/11/201709/04/2019Categories MiMedx
   NASDAQ:MDXGLeave a comment on MiMedx – Caught red-handed circumventing
   VA regulations

   Featured

MiMedx – Vendors soliciting up-coding of Medicare incentives.

   PDF Download Link

   MiMedx emails to former employees are in clear violation of federal
   law: settlements contingent on retracting statements to regulatory
   bodies.

   Viceroy has obtained from a physician an email sent from MiMedx
   employees to physicians to fraudulently exploit the reimbursement
   system to financially benefit both the physician and MiMedx. This is
   done through manipulation of Q-codes which denote the form of treatment
   in which a product was used. The aim is for all treatments using MiMedx
   products to be coded as “wound care” in order to fraudulently maximize
   reimbursement. This type of Medicare fraud is referred to as
   ‘up-coding’.

   In addition to this Viceroy present recent court filings and emails
   showing that MiMedx engaged in illegal settlement terms in its legal
   actions against former employees. MiMedx has sent legal material to
   former employees requesting that they do not contact regulatory
   authorities and has stipulated in its settlement agreements that former
   employees retract their statements to any regulatory body. This is a
   violation of the United States Code of Federal Regulations.

   As a reminder of MiMedx selective statements to its investors, it’s by
   no coincidence that MiMedx are now blatantly cloaking their conduct in
   public courts relating to former employee proceedings on
   confidentiality grounds.

   Viceroy continue to be contacted by physicians, former employees,
   former and current VA employees all speaking on a similar theme when
   explaining MiMedx conduct. We thank these brave individuals for
   fighting back against the unnecessary, aggressive, and retaliatory
   actions of MiMedx.

   Viceroy were informed by various physicians that they had reported
   their concerns to the Office of Inspector General U.S. Department of
   Health & Human Services .

   We are also led to believe that MiMedx’s statement of assisting the
   Department of Veterans Affairs with its on-going investigation is
   incomplete, if not deceptive, via omission. Viceroy believe investors
   should have been told of these investigations and what information was
   requested by VA investigators.

   The more MiMedx management continue to lie to its investors through
   press releases and responses to short seller articles, the more
   disillusioned and harassed former employees send Viceroy evidence
   countering their claims.

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 16/11/201709/04/2019Categories MiMedx
   NASDAQ:MDXGLeave a comment on MiMedx – Vendors soliciting up-coding of
   Medicare incentives.

   Featured

MiMedx – Halloween Special: Viceroy evidence more PODs and channel stuffing
of deceased doctors.

   Part 14 – Halloween Special

   Viceroy have discovered legal proceedings against MiMedx vendor RedMed
   for their alleged role in a kickback scheme and False Claims act
   violations. In addition to this Redmed’s principal Jeff Hannes is also
   involved with several other Physician Owned/related Distributors
   (PODs).

   Viceroy will also highlight MiMedx sales to another POD whose physician
   is no longer alive and the LLC deregistered.

   Viceroy will release details of further PODs shortly.

   Happy Halloween.

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 31/10/201709/04/2019Categories MiMedx
   NASDAQ:MDXGLeave a comment on MiMedx – Halloween Special: Viceroy
   evidence more PODs and channel stuffing of deceased doctors.

   Featured

MiMedx – “The same thing happened at Matria”

   Pete Petit would like us to examine his track record of running public
   companies. We find that Pete and his close-knit board & management has
   a tendency to run them into the ground.

   Part 13 – The same thing happened at Matria
   This report concerns MiMedx directors Parker “Pete” H Petit, Debbie
   Dean and Joseph “Joe” G. Bleser and their previous positions at other
   Petit companies; Healthdyne Inc., Healthdyne Information Enterprises
   (HIE), Healthdyne Maternity Management (HMM) and Matria Healthcare.
   The events detailed in this report resulted in a catastrophic collapse
   of Matria’s share price due to earnings downgrades and revision of
   future performance.


   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 30/10/201709/04/2019Categories MiMedx
   NASDAQ:MDXGLeave a comment on MiMedx – “The same thing happened
   at Matria”

   Featured

MiMedx – Palmer-geddon

   MiMedx employee Ricky Palmer worked as distributor for MiMedx customer,
   selling to the Department of Veterans Affairs and the Department of the
   Army.

   This report concerns MiMedx employee Ricky Palmer and his position at a
   MiMedx distributor Southwest Medical Systems Inc while simultaneously
   being employed at MiMedx.

   PDF Download Link

   Viceroy also addresses major discrepancies in MiMedx’s latest
   “commentary” piece. Specifically, MiMedx claim its “sales agents” do
   not “distribute” MiMedx supplies:

   Short Commentary This statement directly contradicts FDA records
   suggesting many agents in MiMedx’s 2016 sales report both store and
   distribute inventory.


   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 27/10/201709/04/2019Categories MiMedx
   NASDAQ:MDXGLeave a comment on MiMedx – Palmer-geddon

   Featured

MiMedx – 2016 Ortho Sales Reports: Read ‘em & weep

   Viceroy releases MiMedx sales records that directly contradict company
   statements. MiMedx, which department will Viceroy expose next?

   Part 11 MiMedx Ortho Sales Report

   MiMedx has increasingly come under pressure from both analysts and
   short sellers over the past month. The market is waking up to find
   MiMedx’s closet of skeletons quickly spilling open. Dubious hiring
   practices, physician owned distributors, employee owned distributors
   and poor corporate governance are all coming into focus. The specter of
   action by the United States Department of Justice, Office of the
   inspector General of Veteran’s Affairs and the Securities and Exchanges
   Commission now hangs over the company.

   Viceroy has obtained documents from former MiMedx employees detailing
   sales targets and historical figures broken down by distributor. The
   information directly contradicts statements made by MiMedx. Viceroy
   believes that MiMedx has systematically and deliberately misled
   investors and stakeholders and has forwarded this information to the
   relevant authorities.


   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 26/10/201709/04/2019Categories MiMedx
   NASDAQ:MDXGLeave a comment on MiMedx – 2016 Ortho Sales Reports: Read
   ‘em & weep

   Featured

MiMedx – Up Schmidt Creek

   PDF Download Link

   This report is concerned with the creation of Physician Owned/Related
   Distributors (henceforth PODs). The potential for fraud is well
   documented as evidenced by the release of the special fraud alert by
   the Office of the Inspector General of the Department of Health and
   Human Services:

   https://oig.hhs.gov/fraud/docs/alertsandbulletins/2013/pod_special_frau
   d_alert.pdf

   We previously highlighted the activities Donovan Schmidt, MiMedx Market
   Development Manager available here:

   https://viceroyresearch.org/2017/10/03/mimedxs-selective-non-compete-li
   tigation-questionable-disclosures/

   We now evidence MiMedx employee Donovan Schmidt’s active involvement in
   the premediated formation of a physician owned/related distributor
   (POD) with a prominent Atlanta physician.

   “There is a MiMedx employee his name is Donovan Schmidt, he is an
   employee and also a distributor and also worked for Orthofix.” – Former
   MiMedx Employee

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 20/10/201709/04/2019Categories MiMedx
   NASDAQ:MDXGLeave a comment on MiMedx – Up Schmidt Creek

   Featured

MiMedx – More physician owned distributors; MiMedx may not wish to address
its investors but it will have to answer the regulators

   Viceroy is releasing more on illegal Physician-Owned Distributors
   (PODs) operating in the wound care space within the state of Texas. Our
   spreadsheet will follow shortly to expose multi-state PODS and
   conflicted operations.

   PDF Download Link

   Given the large proportion of income derived from Texas sales,
   investors should be concerned, especially as the numerous, undeniable,
   illegal PODs we illustrated on our report dated October 13, 2017 have
   not been addressed by management.

   MiMedx’s blanket denial of Viceroy’s report and aversion to conducting
   an investigation suggest that management are either fully aware of
   these illegal distributors, or have been negligent in their duties…

   MiMedx is not operating in an industry where these abuses are
   commonplace, and yet within the single state of Texas, we have
   connected MiMedx with:
     * Numerous illegal PODs;
     * Numerous related party distributors; and
     * Forest Park Medical Center, a US$40m fraud uncovered by the DOJ and
       FBI.

   Malfeasance by PODs and kickbacks are an abuse of the healthcare
   system. The abuse not only costs patients and insurers but ultimately
   undermines the integrity of physicians where products are prescribed to
   enrich suppliers (namely MiMedx) and kickbacks to physicians in return.

   This report further details connections between MiMedx and its network
   of PODs. This network of distributorships owned by employees and
   physicians allows MiMedx to engaged in large scale channel stuffing
   activities.

   Lou Roselli made the headlines once more last week as an incriminating
   email surfaced where Lou admits MiMedx cannot reconcile inventory to
   federal customers. In the tissues business, this is strictly against
   the law.

   Given the substantive evidence presented in our reports, we call on the
   board of MiMedx launch an immediate external investigation into the
   conduct of senior personnel, and subsequently resign.

   The structure of these distributors leaves open great opportunities to
   exploit the US healthcare system. As a reminder to our readers, the
   Office of the Inspector General of the Department of Health and Human
   Services issued a special fraud warning stating that such ventures
   “should be closely scrutinized under the fraud and abuse laws.”

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 17/10/201709/04/2019Categories MiMedx
   NASDAQ:MDXGLeave a comment on MiMedx – More physician owned
   distributors; MiMedx may not wish to address its investors but it will
   have to answer the regulators

   Featured

MiMedx – Bankruptcy & DOJ/FBI indictments of Physician-Owned Medical Center
inconvenienced MiMedx CPM channel stuffing program

   This report focuses on commercial relationships with currently indicted
   individuals for fraud with direct trading links with MiMedx and
   Physician Owned Distributors (PODs) in Texas with more to come.

   PDF Download Link

   In this report, we detail exactly what MiMedx management withheld about
   its relationship with CPM Medical & unquestionably evidence PODs that
   have sold & are selling MiMedx products, with full references & FDA
   evidence. MiMedx’s channel stuffing distributor, CPM Medical, defaulted
   on its credit terms due to a DOJ/FBI crackdown on a key client, Forest
   Park Medical Center – a convicted US$40M fraudulent kickback scheme.

   Viceroy also present indisputable FDA evidence that MiMedx was
   specifically trading with physician’s spouses – via
   physician-owned/related distributors registered to store MiMedx
   products ONLY.

   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 13/10/201709/04/2019Categories MiMedx
   NASDAQ:MDXGLeave a comment on MiMedx – Bankruptcy & DOJ/FBI indictments
   of Physician-Owned Medical Center inconvenienced MiMedx CPM channel
   stuffing program

   Featured

MiMedx – More whistleblowers come forward with details of MiMedx sales scheme

   PDF Report Download Link

   Viceroy has previously published on MiMedx detailing its dubious hiring
   practices, connections to related party employee-owned distributors,
   improper government filings and undisclosed SEC investigation. Since
   publication many former MiMedx employees that are not in legal conflict
   with MiMedx have reached out to Viceroy to provide information and
   corroboration of our investigations.

   Information Viceroy has received from a further Whistleblower expands
   and gives details into the channel stuffing practices at MiMedx,
   including the structure of the employee and physician owned
   distributors and mechanisms of sales enticements.


   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 10/10/201709/04/2019Categories MiMedx
   NASDAQ:MDXGLeave a comment on MiMedx – More whistleblowers come forward
   with details of MiMedx sales scheme

Pareteum – Related party share incentive schemes

   July 2, 2019 – Pareteum yesterday announced that its Q2 2019
   performance will exceed analysts expectations on Revenue and Adjusted
   EBITDA will beat consensus. This press release is laughable in light of
   Viceroy and Aurelius’ exploration of Pareteum’s “customers”, who are
   financially unable to fulfil the multi-million dollar contracts
   announced by management.

   Report Download Link

   Pareteum can record as much revenue on paper as they like from their
   “customers”, however this will not improve the Company’s dire cash
   position and ballooning payables balance.

   We challenge Pareteum to transparency through the provision
   end-of-quarter receivables, payables, and cash balances to its
   stakeholders.

   This report further explores Pareteum and Iran sanctions.


   Author Viceroy ResearchPosted on 02/07/201902/07/2019Categories
   Pareteum NASDAQ:TEUMLeave a comment on Pareteum – Related party share
   incentive schemes

Posts navigation

   Page 1 Page 2 … Page 10 Next page

Viceroy’s Coverage

     * AMD NASDAQ:AMD
     * Caesarstone NASDAQ:CSTE
     * Capitec JSE:CPI
     * Ebix NASDAQ:EBIX
     * MiMedx NASDAQ:MDXG
     * NEPI Rockcastle JSE:NRP
     * Neuroderm NASDAQ:NDRM
     * Pareteum NASDAQ:TEUM
     * Pretium TSE/NYSE:PVG
     * ProSieben ETR:PSM
     * Quintis ASXL:QIN
     * Steinhoff ETR/JSE:SNH
     * Syrah Resources ASX:SYR

Follow Viceroy on Twitter

   My Tweets

Subscribe to email updates

   Subscribe to Viceroy Research by Email

     * Home
     * About
     * Contact

     * Twitter
     * Contact Us
     * Contact

   Viceroy Research WordPress.com.

   Viceroy Research
   WordPress.com.


   ____________________________________________________________
   ____________________________________________________________
   ____________________________________________________________
   ____________________________________________________________
   Post to
   Cancel Reblog Post
